New York, session 2025-2026, S7728.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 6 of 2 section 3502 of the public health law, as amended by chapter 486 of the 3 laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any other 5 provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, licensed practi- 6 tioners, persons licensed under this article and unlicensed personnel 7 employed at a local correctional facility may, in a manner permitted by 8 the regulations promulgated pursuant to this subdivision, utilize body 9 imaging scanning equipment that applies ionizing radiation to humans for 10 purposes of screening incarcerated individuals committed to such facili- 11 ty, and visitors to such facility, in connection with the implementation 12 of such facility's security program. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided however, that 14 the amendments to subdivision 6 of section 3502 of the public health law 15 made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 16 subdivision and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07802-02-5